Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-318
Current model year vehicle, defined.

Current model year vehicle means a motor vehicle or trailer for which the model year as designated by the manufacturer corresponds to the calendar year.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 18.